Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 62.
LOCAL CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT BONDS (CONST. AMENDS. 13, 17, 25 AND 49, REPEALED; AND SECTIONS ADDED).

Publisher's Notes.

With respect to the requirement for approval of bond issues, this amendment may be superseded by Ark. Const. Amend. 65.

This amendment was proposed by H.J.R. No. 1 (see Acts 1983, p. 2305) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on Mar. 29, 1983. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 6, 1984, by a vote of 395,336 for and 342,404 against.

Ark. Const. Amend. 62, § 11, repealed Ark. Const. Amends. 13, 17, 25, and 49.

Cross References.

Economic and Industrial Development Revenue Bond Law, § 14-164-501 et seq.

Local Government Bond Act, § 14-164-301 et seq.

Local Government Capital Improvement Revenue Bond Act, § 14-164-401 et seq.

§ 1. Local capital improvement bonds authorized — Election — Taxes — Limit on indebtedness — Suspension of tax levy.

The legislative body of a municipality or county, with the consent of a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question at an election called for that purpose, may authorize the issuance of bonds for capital improvements of a public nature, as defined by the General Assembly, in amounts approved by a majority of those voting on the question either at an election called for that purpose or at a general election. The General Assembly shall prescribe a uniform method of calling and holding such elections and the terms upon which the bonds may be issued. If more than one purpose is proposed, each shall be stated separately on the ballot. The election shall be held no earlier than thirty (30) days after it is called by the legislative body. The tax to retire the bonds may be an ad valorem tax on real and personal property. Other taxes may be authorized by the General Assembly or the legislative body to retire the bonds.

The limit of the principal amount of bonded indebtedness of the municipality or county which may be outstanding and unpaid at the time of issuance of any bonds secured by a tax on real or personal property, except for bonds issued for economic development projects pursuant to Section 2 hereof, shall be a sum equal to ten percent (10%) for a county or twenty percent (20%) for a municipality of the total assessed value for tax purposes of real and personal property in the county or municipality, as determined by the last tax assessment.

The municipality or county may from time to time, suspend the collection of a levy, when not required for the payment of its bonds, subject to the covenants with the bondholders. [As amended by Const. Amend. 89, § 14; Const. Amend. 97.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 89, § 14, amended this section effective January 1, 2011. Amendment 89 was proposed by H.J.R. 1004 during the 2009 Regular Session and adopted at the 2010 general election by a vote of 448,711 for and 250,167 against.

Before amendment by Amend. 89, subsection (a) read: “The legislative body of a municipality or county, with the consent of a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question at an election called for that purpose, may authorize the issuance of bonds, to bear interest at a rate not to exceed two percent (2%) per annum above the Federal Reserve Rate at the time of the election authorizing the bonds, for capital improvements of a public nature, as defined by the General Assembly, in amounts approved by a majority of those voting on the question either at an election called for that purpose or at a general election. The General Assembly shall prescribe a uniform method of calling and holding such elections and the terms upon which the bonds may be issued. If more than one purpose is proposed, each shall be stated separately on the ballot. The election shall be held no earlier than thirty (30) days after it is called by the legislative body. The tax to retire the bonds may be an ad valorem tax on real and personal property. Other taxes may be authorized by the General Assembly or the legislative body to retire the bonds.”

Ark. Const. Amend. 97, which amended this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 16 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2016 general election by a vote of 689,980 for and 366,020 against. The amendment substituted “economic development projects” for “industrial development purposes” in (b), and was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to § 7-9-119.

Amend. 97, § 1, provided: “INTENT. The intent of this amendment to the Arkansas Constitution is to encourage job creation, job expansion, and economic development.”

§ 2. Issuance of bonds to secure and develop industry — Levy of tax — Suspension of collection — Limit on tax levy.

In addition to the authority for bonded indebtedness set forth in Section 1, any municipality or county may, with the consent of the majority of the voters voting on the question at an election held for that purpose, issue bonds in sums approved by such majority at that election for the purpose of financing economic development projects within or near the county or municipality holding the election.

To provide for payment of principal and interest of the bonds issued pursuant to the section, as they mature, the municipality or county may levy a special tax, not to exceed five (5) mills on the dollar of the taxable real and personal property therein. However, the municipality or county may, from time to time, suspend the collection of such annual levy when not required for the payment of its bonds. In no event shall any parcel of real and personal taxable property be subject to a special tax levied under the authority of this Section in excess of five (5) mills for bonds issued under this Section.

Other taxes may be authorized by the General Assembly or the legislative body to retire the bonds.

As used in this section:

“Economic development projects” means the land, buildings, furnishings, equipment, facilities, infrastructure, and improvements that are required or suitable for the development, retention, or expansion of:

Manufacturing, production, and industrial facilities;

Research, technology, and development facilities;

Recycling facilities;

Distribution centers;

Call centers;

Warehouse facilities;

Job training facilities;

Regional or national corporate headquarters facilities; and

Sports complexes designed to host local, state, regional, and national competitions, including without limitation baseball, softball, and other sports tournaments; and

“Infrastructure” means:

Land acquisition;

Site preparation;

Road and highway improvements;

Rail spur, railroad, and railport construction;

Water service;

Wastewater treatment;

Employee training which may include equipment for such purpose; and

Environmental mitigation or reclamation.

The General Assembly, by a three-fourths vote of each house, may amend the provisions of subsection (d) of this section so long as the amendments are germane to this section and consistent with its policy and purposes. [As amended by Const. Amend. 97; Acts 2019, No. 1072, § 2.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 97, which amended this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 16 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2016 general election by a vote of 689,980 for and 366,020 against. The amendment substituted “economic development projects” for “facilities for the securing and developing of industry” in (a) and added (c) through (e). The amendment was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to § 7-9-119.

Amend. 97, § 1, provided: “INTENT. The intent of this amendment to the Arkansas Constitution is to encourage job creation, job expansion, and economic development.”

Legislative Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added (d)(1)(I).

§ 3. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 97, which repealed this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 16 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2016 general election by a vote of 689,980 for and 366,020 against. Ark. Const. Amend. 97 was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to § 7-9-119.

Before repeal, this section read:

“§ 3. Sale of bonds — Procedure.

“The bonds described in Section 2 hereof shall be sold only at public sale after twenty (20) days advertisement in a newspaper having a bona fide circulation in the municipality or county issuing such bonds; provided, however, that the municipality or county may exchange such bonds for bonds of like amount, rate or interest, and length of issue.”

§ 4. Maximum rate of tax stated on ballot — Borrowing prior to issuance of bonds.

The maximum rate of any special tax to pay bonded indebtedness as authorized in Sections 1 and 2 hereof shall be stated on the ballot. After such bond issue has been approved by the electorate, the municipality or county may, prior to the issuance of the bonds, borrow funds on an interim basis, not to exceed three (3) years, and pledge to the payment thereof the tax approved by the voters.

§ 5. Special tax constitutes special fund — Disbursement of surplus.

The special tax for payment of bonded indebtedness authorized in Sections 1 and 2 hereof shall constitute a special fund pledged as security for the payment of such indebtedness. The special tax shall never be extended for any other purpose, nor collected for any greater length of time than necessary to retire such bonded indebtedness. Upon retirement of the bonded indebtedness, any surplus tax collections which may have accumulated shall be transferred to the general funds of the municipality or county. [As amended by Const. Amend. 97.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 97, which amended this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 16 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2016 general election by a vote of 689,980 for and 366,020 against. The amendment deleted “except that tax receipts in excess of the amount required to retire the debt according to its terms may, subject to covenants entered into with the holders of the bonds, be pledged as security for the issuance of additional bonds if authorized by the voters. The tax for such additional bonds shall terminate within the time provided for the tax originally imposed” following “indebtedness” in the second sentence. The amendment was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to § 7-9-119.

Amend. 97, § 1, provided: “INTENT. The intent of this amendment to the Arkansas Constitution is to encourage job creation, job expansion, and economic development.”

§ 6. Conduct of elections.

The General Assembly may enact laws governing the conduct of elections authorized by this Amendment. Absent the enactment of such laws, such elections shall be held, called and conducted in accordance with the laws governing elections generally. The results of such election shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or municipality (as the case may be) and any contest of such election or the tabulation of the votes therein shall be brought within thirty (30) days after such publication or shall be forever barred.

§ 7. Provisions self-executing.

The provisions of this Amendment shall be self-executing.

§ 8. Taxes levied and bonds authorized prior to amendment.

Taxes levied prior to the effective date of this Amendment shall continue in force until abolished, reduced, or increased as provided by law. All bonds and other evidences of indebtedness authorized prior to the effective date of this Amendment shall be governed by the Constitutional provision and laws in effect at the time of authorization.

§ 9. Joint project of various governing bodies — Compact agreement elections.

Whenever two or more cities of the First or Second Class, or incorporated towns, and/or one or more counties and the school districts therein, desire to join together in a combined effort to secure and develop economic development projects within one or more of such cities, towns, counties, and share in the increased revenues estimated to be received by the city, town, or county, or school district, in which the economic development project or projects are to be located, they may, upon adoption by the governing bodies of each such city, town, school district, or county, enter into a compact setting forth the terms by which each of the participating cities, towns, school districts, and counties is to share in the revenues to be derived from the location of an economic development project within the compact area through the combined efforts of the various participating cities, towns, school districts, and counties. Upon adoption of such compact by the governing bodies of the participating cities, towns, school districts, and/or counties, the county court of each of the counties involved shall cause a special election to be called within not more than forty-five (45) days from the date of the filing of such compact with the county court. At such special election, the qualified electors of each of the cities, towns, school districts, and counties shall vote on whether to approve the compact and the method of sharing in increased revenues to be derived by the city, school district, and/or county in which the proposed economic development project is to be located among the various participating cities, towns, counties, and school districts. The ballot at such election shall be in substantially the following form:

As used in this section:

“Economic development projects” means the land, buildings, furnishings, equipment, facilities, infrastructure, and improvements that are required or suitable for the development, retention, or expansion of:

Manufacturing, production, and industrial facilities;

Research, technology, and development facilities;

Recycling facilities;

Distribution centers;

Call centers;

Warehouse facilities;

Job training facilities; and

Regional or national corporate headquarters facilities; and

“Infrastructure” means:

Land acquisition;

Site preparation;

Road and highway improvements;

Rail spur, railroad, and railport construction;

Water service;

Wastewater treatment;

Employee training which may include equipment for such purpose; and

Environmental mitigation or reclamation.

The General Assembly, by a three-fourths vote of each house, may amend the provisions of subsection (b) of this section so long as the amendments are germane to this section and consistent with its policy and purposes. [As amended by Const. Amend. 97.]

“FOR the establishment of an economic development compact and the sharing of revenues to be derived from additional taxes to be generated by new economic development projects
♦
AGAINST the establishment of an economic develop- ment compact and the sharing of revenues to be derived from additional taxes to be generated by new economic development projects
♦

Click to view table.

Said election shall be conducted in accordance with the election laws of this State, and the results thereof tabulated and certified to the County Clerk in the manner now provided by law. If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question vote in favor of the creation of the compact, and the sharing of revenues to be derived from new economic development projects located in the compact area, the said compact shall be implemented in accordance with the terms thereof. If a majority of the qualified electors voting on said issue vote against issue at said special election, no additional election on said issue may be held within one (1) year from the date of said election. The results of said election shall be proclaimed by the county court of each of the counties in which the county and/or cities and towns, or school districts, are located. The results of said election shall be conclusive unless attacked in the courts within thirty (30) days.

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 97, which amended this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 16 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2016 general election by a vote of 689,980 for and 366,020 against. The amendment, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “economic development projects” for “industries”, “economic development project or projects” for “industry or industries”, and “economic development project” for “industrial plant”, substituted “economic development compact” for “industrial development compact” twice in the form, and made similar substitutions throughout, and added (b) and (c).

Amend. 97 was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to § 7-9-119.

Amend. 97, § 1, provided: “INTENT. The intent of this amendment to the Arkansas Constitution is to encourage job creation, job expansion, and economic development.”